Delaware, session 153, HB226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE:
1 Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $37,632,955 (Thirty-Seven Million, Six Hundred Thirty-Two
2 Thousand, Nine Hundred Fifty-Five Dollars) in General Funds to Executive, Office of Management and Budget,
3 Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11) for the following purposes:
4 (01-08-01) Technology $1,200,000
5 (01-08-02) Equipment $7,000
6 (02-08-10) Equipment $34,100
7 (02-13-10) Permit to Purchase $13,300
8 (02-18-01) Technology $9,000
9 (02-18-05) Equipment $6,700
10 (02-18-07) Survey $15,200
11 (10-02-11) ERP Cloud Migration $2,000,000
12 (10-02-11) Technology $432,200
13 (10-02-11) Health Care Services Contingency $3,500,000
14 (10-02-11) Trauma Informed Services Contingency $2,000,000
15 (10-02-11) Technology Strategic Recruiting $275,000
16 (10-02-11) Equipment $100,000
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 1 of 16

17 (10-02-11) Equipment $460,620
18 (10-02-11) Equipment $100,000
19 (10-02-11) Equipment $176,680
20 (10-02-11) Equipment $6,700
21 (10-02-11) Equipment $13,400
22 (10-02-11) Technology $184,000
23 (10-02-11) Automated Voter Registration $300,000
24 (10-07-01) Grants System $56,500
25 (10-07-02) Permit to Purchase $6,700
26 (12-03-02) Insurance Revenue Shortfall $1,000,000
27 (12-05-06) Delaware EARNS $403,700
28 (15-02-02) Equipment $23,800
29 (15-02-03) Conflict Attorneys $1,200,000
30 (20-03-01) Delaware Heritage Commission $500,000
31 (20-10-01) Grocery Initiative $1,400,000
32 (35-05-20) Residential Lead Remediation $1,350,000
33 (35-07-01) Smart Food Program $1,485,000
34 (35-07-01) Emergency Housing/Shelters $750,000
35 (38-01-03) Prison Research Innovation Network $52,700
36 (38-01-14) DACS Update $245,000
37 (40-03-03) Kingston-upon Hull Architectural Study $80,000
38 (45-01-20) Equipment $350,000
39 (45-02-10) Equipment $200,000
40 (45-06-01) First Responder – Wellness Application Support $400,000
41 (45-06-01) Equipment $850,000
42 (45-06-08) Permit to Purchase $858,400
43 (60-01-40) Equipment $200,000
44 (75-02-01) Emergency Training Equipment $37,000
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 2 of 16

45 (75-03-01) First Responder – Wellness Application Support $400,000
46 (90-01-01) Anatomical Donor Program $200,255
47 (90-01-01) Midwifery Program $1,000,000
48 (90-03-01) Operations $5,000,000
49 (95-02-01) School Cell Phone Pilot $250,000
50 (95-02-02) Teacher-Driven Projects $3,000,000
51 (95-02-02) Student Discipline Program $2,000,000
52 (95-02-02) School-Based Intervention Services Pilot Program $1,000,000
53 (95-03-20) Early Childhood System Updates $1,700,000
54 (95-03-50) Adult Trade Extension/Apprenticeship $500,000
55 (95-03-50) Adult Basic Education $300,000
56 Section 2. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $7,000 to Legislative, Office of the Controller
57 General (01-08-02) for Equipment. The expenditure of these funds shall be contingent upon the passage of House Bill
58 190 or similar legislation of the 153rd General Assembly.
59 Section 3. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $13,300 in Permit to Purchase to Judicial, Justice of the Peace
60 Court (02-13-10). The expenditure of these funds shall support full implementation of Senate Substitute 1 for Senate
61 Bill 2 as passed by the 152nd General Assembly.
62 Section 4. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $6,700 for Equipment to the Judicial,
63 Administrative Office of the Courts – Non-Judicial Services, Office of the Child Advocate (02-18-05). The
64 expenditure of these funds shall be contingent upon the passage of House Bill 42 or similar legislation of the 153rd
65 General Assembly.
66 Section 5. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $15,200 for a Survey to Judicial, Administrative
67 Office of the Courts – Non-Judicial Services, Delaware Nursing Home Residents Quality Assurance Commission (02-
68 18-07). The expenditure of these funds shall be used for the purposes of conducting a resident, family, and staff
69 engagement and satisfaction research survey among Delaware’s nursing home resident facilities. To any extent
70 necessary, the provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69 shall not apply.
71 Section 6. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $3,500,000 to Executive, Office of Management and Budget,
72 Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11) for Health Care Services Contingency. These funds shall be used to
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 3 of 16

73 supplement Fiscal Year 2026 reductions to state-operated health programs, with the intent that the agencies affected
74 will determine alternative state, federal, or private funding sources to sustain the existing programs in subsequent
75 fiscal years if continued.
76 Section 7. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $100,000 for Equipment to Executive, Office of
77 Management and Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11). The expenditure of these funds shall be
78 contingent upon the passage of Senate Bill 4 or similar legislation of the 153rd General Assembly establishing an
79 Office of the Inspector General.
80 Section 8. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $460,620 for Equipment to Executive, Office of
81 Management and Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11). The expenditure of these funds shall be
82 contingent upon the passage of Senate Substitute 1 for Senate Bill 10 or similar legislation of the 153rd General
83 Assembly.
84 Section 9. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $100,000 for Equipment to Executive, Office of
85 Management and Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11). The expenditure of these funds shall be
86 contingent upon the passage of Senate Bill 11 or similar legislation of the 153rd General Assembly.
87 Section 10. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $176,680 for Equipment to Executive, Office of
88 Management and Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11). The expenditure of these funds shall be
89 contingent upon the passage of Senate Substitute 1 for Senate Bill 17 or similar legislation of the 153rd General
90 Assembly.
91 Section 11. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $6,700 for Equipment to Executive, Office of
92 Management and Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11). The expenditure of these funds shall be
93 contingent upon the passage of Senate Bill 32 or similar legislation of the 153rd General Assembly.
94 Section 12. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $13,400 for Equipment to Executive, Office of
95 Management and Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11). The expenditure of these funds shall be
96 contingent upon the passage of Senate Substitute 1 for Senate Bill 115 or similar legislation of the 153rd General
97 Assembly.
98 Section 13. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $184,000 for Technology to Executive, Office of
99 Management and Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11). The expenditure of these funds shall be
100 contingent upon the passage of House Bill 128 or similar legislation of the 153rd General Assembly.
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 4 of 16

101 Section 14. (a) Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $300,000 to Executive, Office of Management
102 and Budget, Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11) for Automated Voter Registration. These funds shall be
103 used for costs at the Division of Motor Vehicles and the Department of Elections to allow voters to directly register
104 their party affiliation at the Division of Motor Vehicles.
105 (b) Amend § 2050, Title 15 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions
106 as shown by underline as follows:
107 § 2050. Registration through state agencies.
108 (a) Registration through the Division of Motor Vehicles.
109 (1) For each person who is not registered to vote and is of sufficient age to register to vote and whose
110 information is not transmitted to the Department of Elections pursuant to § 2050A of this title, each application for
111 a motor vehicle driver’s license under the laws of Delaware (including any renewal application) shall serve as an
112 application for voter registration. However, any person who, at the time of the transaction with the Division of
113 Motor Vehicles, provides a document that demonstrates noncitizenship shall not be offered the opportunity to
114 register to vote. The Division of Motor Vehicles may not offer an opportunity to register to vote to an individual
115 applying for a driving privileges card or permit under § 2711(d) of Title 21. The Division of Motor Vehicles is a
116 voter registration agency for purposes of this subchapter and must provide the voter registration services under §
117 2050A of this title.
118 (2) [Repealed.]
119 (3) An applicant for a motor vehicle license under this section may decline in writing to be registered to
120 vote by way of the application for a motor vehicle driver’s license. The fact that an applicant has declined to be
121 registered through the motor vehicle application process shall not be used for any purpose other than voter
122 registration. [Repealed.]
123 (4) Applications for a motor vehicle license under this section shall include as a part of the application a
124 voter registration component. The voter registration component may not require any information which duplicates
125 information required in the motor vehicle license component other than a second signature or information listed in
126 paragraph (a)(5)a. of this section. If the applicant desires not to register to vote, the transmission of an electronic
127 record will notify the Department of Elections of the applicant’s intention. [Repealed.]
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 5 of 16

128 (5) The voter registration component of the motor vehicle license application under this section shall
129 contain all of the following:
130 a. The minimum amount of information necessary to ensure the prevention of duplicate voter registrations
131 and preserve the ability of election officials to determine eligibility of the applicant and otherwise administer voter
132 registration and the election process.
133 b. A statement setting forth voting eligibility requirements and an attestation that the applicant meets the
134 requirements.
135 c. The signature of the applicant under penalty of perjury.
136 d. No requirement of notarization or other formal authorization. [Repealed.]
137 (6) [Repealed.]
138 (c) Amend § 2050A, Title 15 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and
139 insertions as shown by underline as follows:
140 § 2050A. Automatic voter registration at the Division of Motor Vehicles and other agencies.
141 (a)(1) Each person who, in the course of business with the Division of Motor Vehicles, provides documentation
142 demonstrating United States citizenship, shall be confirmed in the Division of Motor Vehicles database as meeting the
143 citizenship requirement for eligibility to vote. The course of business with the Division of Motor Vehicles applies to any
144 person who comes to an office of the Division of Motor Vehicles or accesses its website in order to conduct any of the
145 following transactions: Except as provided under paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(3) of this section and subject to paragraphs
146 (a)(4) and (a)(5) of this section, an individual who conducts any of the following transactions with the Division of Motor
147 Vehicles, in person or on the Division’s website, is to be automatically registered to vote as part of the transaction:
148 (1)a. The issuance or replacement of a commercial driver’s license under Chapter 26 of Title 21, a
149 Level 1 Learner’s Permit or Class D operator’s license under § 2710 of Title 21, a license under § 2711 of Title
150 21, or an identification card under § 3102 of Title 21.
151 (2)b. The renewal of a commercial driver’s license under Chapter 26 of Title 21, a Level 1 Learner’s
152 Permit or Class D operator’s license under § 2710 of Title 21, a license under § 2711 of Title 21, or an
153 identification card under § 3102 of Title 21.
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 6 of 16

154 (3)c. The change of an individual’s legal name or residence address listed on a commercial driver’s
155 license under Chapter 26 of Title 21, a Level 1 Learner’s Permit or Class D operator’s license under § 2710 of
156 Title 21, a license under § 2711 of Title 21, or an identification card under § 3102 of Title 21.
157 (2) An individual conducting a transaction under paragraphs (a)(1)a. through (a)(1)c. of this section may
158 decline to be registered to vote.
159 (3) The Division of Motor Vehicles may not register an individual to vote under this subsection if any of
160 the following apply:
161 a. At the time of the transaction with the Division of Motor Vehicles, the individual provides a
162 document that demonstrates the individual is not a United States citizen.
163 b. The Division of Motor Vehicles has information that the individual is not a United States citizen.
164 c. The individual is applying for a driving privileges card or permit under § 2711(d) of Title 21.
165 d. The individual declines to be registered to vote under paragraph (a)(2) of this section. The fact that
166 the individual declines to be registered to vote under this subsection is confidential and may not be used for
167 any purpose other than voter registration.
168 (4) The application associated with a transaction under paragraphs (a)(1)a. through (a)(1)c. of this section
169 must include as part of the individual’s application a voter registration component.
170 a. The voter registration component of the application must include all of the following:
171 1. The minimum amount of information necessary to ensure the prevention of duplicate voter
172 registrations and preserve the ability of election officials to determine the individual’s eligibility to vote
173 and otherwise administer voter registration and the election process. This information must include the
174 individual’s choice of political party affiliation or choice to not be affiliated with a political party.
175 2. A statement setting forth voting eligibility requirements and an attestation that the individual
176 meets the requirements.
177 3. The signature of the individual under penalty of perjury.
178 b. The voter registration component of the application is not required to include a notarization or other
179 formal authorization.
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 7 of 16

180 (5) The voter registration component may not require any information which duplicates information
181 required as part of the transaction under paragraphs (a)(1)a. through (a)(1)c. of this section other than a second
182 signature or information under paragraph (a)(4)a. of this section.
183 (b) (1) For each individual who is confirmed in the Division of Motor Vehicles database as meeting the
184 citizenship requirement for eligibility to vote, and who is not registered to vote and who is of sufficient age to register
185 to vote, the Division of Motor Vehicles shall provide to the Department of Elections all of the following information
186 about the individual:
187 a. The individual’s name.
188 b. The individual’s date of birth.
189 c. The individual’s driver’s license or state ID number.
190 d. The individual’s residence address and mailing address, if different from the residence address.
191 e. The individual’s county of residence.
192 f. The individual’s citizenship status. [Repealed].
193 g. An electronic image of the individual’s signature.
194 h. The individual’s choice of political party affiliation or choice to not be affiliated with a political
195 party.
196 i. If the individual declines to be registered to vote under paragraph (a)(2) of this section.
197 (2) The Division of Motor Vehicles shall transmit the information in paragraph (b)(1) of this section to the
198 Department of Elections electronically, at least on a daily basis, and in a format agreed upon by the Division of
199 Motor Vehicles and the Department of Elections. The Department of Elections must be able to upload the
200 information onto the statewide computerized voter registration database.
201 (c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to amend the substantive qualifications for voter registration in
202 this State or to require documentary proof of citizenship for voter registration.
203 (d) (1) Upon receiving a complete electronic record for an individual who is not registered to vote, is of
204 sufficient age to register to vote, and who has demonstrated United States citizenship, and did not elect to decline to
205 register to vote under paragraph (a)(2) of this section, the Department of Elections shall, upon determination that the
206 individual is eligible to register to vote, do all of the following:
207 a. Register the individual to vote.
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 8 of 16

208 b. Mark the individual as unaffiliated. Register the individual’s choice of political party affiliation or
209 choice to not be affiliated with a political party
210 c. Send the individual a notice under paragraph (e)(1) of this section.
211 (2) If the Department of Elections determines that a person an individual under paragraph (d)(1) of this
212 section is ineligible to register to vote, the Department of Elections may not register the individual to vote or send
213 the individual a notice under paragraph (e)(1) of this section.
214 (3) If the electronic record received for an individual does not include the information required by
215 paragraph (b)(1) of this section, the Department of Elections shall ask the individual to provide the necessary
216 additional information, pursuant to procedures set out by Department of Elections regulations.
217 (e) (1) For any individual registered to vote pursuant to paragraph (d)(1) of this section, the Department of
218 Elections shall send to the person’s address of record, by nonforwardable mail, a notice that the individual has been
219 registered to vote that contains a postage paid preaddressed return form by which the person may affiliate with a political
220 party or decline to be registered. individual’s address of record the notice required under § 2014(c) of this title, which
221 may include any additional information the Department of Elections determines is appropriate. If the notice is returned
222 as undeliverable, the Department of Elections shall send the person an address verification request under § 2014(c) of
223 this title.
224 (2) A notice mailed under paragraph (e)(1) of this section must include an explanation of the eligibility
225 requirements to register to vote and a statement indicating that if the person is not eligible, the person should decline
226 to register using the preaddressed return form. The notice must also state the penalties for submission of a false
227 application. [Repealed.]
228 (3) The notice provided under paragraph (e)(1) of this section must also include a statement indicating that
229 if the person declines to register to vote, the fact that the person has declined registration will remain confidential
230 and will be used only for election administration purposes, and a statement indicating that if a person does not
231 decline registration, the office at which the person was registered will remain confidential and will be used only for
232 election administration purposes. [Repealed.]
233 (4) The notice provided under paragraph (e)(1) of this section must include a statement instructing the
234 person to select a political party in order to vote in that party’s political primary. The notice must also inform the
235 person that they may affiliate with a political party by using the State’s online voter registration system. [Repealed.]
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 9 of 16

236 (5) The notice provided under paragraph (e)(1) of this section must provide information regarding
237 participation in the Address Confidentiality Program pursuant to § 1303 of this title. [Repealed.]
238 (6) The Department of Elections shall prescribe the form of the notice described in paragraph (e)(1) of this
239 section. Such notice may be combined with the notice provided to newly registered voters required under § 2014(c)
240 of this title. [Repealed.]
241 (f) (1) If a person returns the notice provided under paragraph (e)(1) of this section and declines to be registered,
242 the person’s registration is cancelled, and the person is deemed to have never registered. If the person has voted in an
243 election after the transfer of the person’s record but before the notice is returned, the returned form is of no effect and
244 the person is registered as of the date of the person’s application with the Division of Motor Vehicles.
245 (2) If a person returns the notice provided under paragraph (e)(1) of this section and affiliates with a party,
246 the person is registered as of the date of the person’s application with the Division of Motor Vehicles, and the
247 person’s affiliation shall be marked effective as of the date the affiliation information is received.
248 (3) If a person returns the notice provided under paragraph (e)(1) of this section without marking the option
249 to decline or the option to affiliate with a party, the returned form is of no effect. The person is registered as of the
250 date of the person’s application with the Division of Motor Vehicles.
251 (4) If a notice provided under paragraph (e)(1) of this section is returned as undeliverable, the Department
252 of Elections must send the person an address verification request pursuant to § 2014(c) of this title.
253 (5) Information relating to the return of a notice form declining to be registered may not be used for any
254 purpose other than election administration. [Repealed.]
255 (l) (1) The Department of Elections shall produce an annual public report to the Governor and General
256 Assembly that includes all of the following:
257 a. The number of records transferred to the Department of Elections under this section, categorized by
258 the source agency.
259 b. The number of voters newly added to the statewide voter registration list because of records
260 transferred, categorized by the source agency.
261 c. The number of voters on the statewide voter registration list whose information was updated because
262 of records transferred, categorized by the source agency and the type of information update.
263 d. The number of individuals who declined voter registration.
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 10 of 16

264 e. Information on the implementation of audits, security, and privacy protocols.
265 f. Any efforts the Department of Elections and source agencies plan to make to improve the efficiency
266 and effectiveness of the voter registration process, by source agency.
267 (2) For items in paragraphs (l)(1)a. through d. of this section, the report shall be subcategorized by sex and
268 age of the individuals included.
269 (3) The report may not include any personal identifying information.
270 (4) To meet the requirement to produce the report to the General Assembly, the Department of Elections
271 shall provide the report to all of the following:
272 a. The President Pro Tempore and Secretary of the Senate, for distribution to all Senators.
273 b. The Speaker and Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives, for distribution to all Representatives.
274 c. The Director and Librarian of the Division of Legislative Services.
275 (d) Amend § 3161, Title 15 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions
276 as shown by underline as follows:
277 § 3161. Voting procedure.
278 (b) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, if a qualified unaffiliated voter who is registered to vote for
279 the first time pursuant to § 2050A of this title appears at a primary election and indicates the intent to enroll in the party
280 holding the primary election, such voter shall be enrolled immediately in that party and be permitted to cast a regular
281 ballot for the primary election. [Repealed.]
282 (e) The Department of Elections shall notify individuals registered to vote under Chapter 71 of Volume 83 of
283 the Laws of Delaware from August 17, 2024, to the effective date of subsections (b) through (d) of this Section, which
284 is established by subsection (f) of this Section, that the individuals may change or select political affiliation under §
285 2049(a) of Title 15 of the Delaware Code.
286 (f) Subsections (b) through (d) of this Section take effect on the date of publication in the Register of
287 Regulations of a notice by the State Election Commissioner that the information technology infrastructure to implement
288 subsections (b) through (d) of this Section is fully operational. The State Election Commissioner shall submit the notice
289 to the Registrar of Regulations for publication.
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 11 of 16

290 Section 15. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $6,700 in Permit to Purchase to Executive, Criminal Justice,
291 Delaware Justice Information System (10-07-02). The expenditure of these funds shall support full implementation of
292 Senate Substitute 1 for Senate Bill 2 as passed by the 152nd General Assembly.
293 Section 16. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $23,800 in Equipment to Office of Defense Services, Public
294 Defender (15-02-02). The expenditure of these funds shall support full implementation of House Bill 86 as passed by
295 the 152nd General Assembly.
296 Section 17. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $1,350,000 to the Department of Health and
297 Social Services, Division of Public Health, Community Health (35-05-20) for the Residential Lead Remediation to the
298 Delaware Lead-Based Paint Abatement and Remediation Fund established by Title 16, §2613 of the Delaware Code. If
299 House Substitute 1 for House Bill 70 of the 153rd General Assembly or similar legislation is enacted into law, the
300 Department of Health and Social Services may use up to $350,000 of these funds to develop and implement a database
301 and tracking system to monitor remediation and activities, and may transfer any funds between the Delaware Lead-
302 Based Paint Abatement and Remediation Fund and the Lead-based Paint Hazard and Control Grant and Loan program
303 to meet demand. The Department of Health and Social Services shall provide a report on the expenditure of these
304 funds to the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee and the Controller General by May 4, 2026.
305 Section 18. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $1,485,000 for the Smart Food Program to the
306 Department of Health and Social Services, Social Services (35-07-01). These funds shall be used for initial
307 implementation and development of the Smart Food Program and application. Upon implementation, the department
308 shall provide a report to the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee, the Controller General, and the Director of the
309 Office of Management and Budget on the status of implementation efforts, the number of participating users, the
310 estimated expenditures of application development and the projected annual expenditures necessary to continue the
311 program.
312 Section 19. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $245,000 for DACS Update to Department of
313 Correction, Administration, and Information Technology (38-01-14). The expenditure of these funds shall be
314 contingent upon the passage of Senate Bill 7 or similar legislation of the 153rd General Assembly.
315 Section 20. Section 1 of this Act provides an appropriation of $400,000 to Department of Safety and Homeland
316 Security, State Police, Executive (45-06-01) and $400,000 to Fire Prevention Commission, State Fire Prevention
317 Commission (75-03-01) for First Responder – Wellness Application Support. The expenditure of these funds is
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 12 of 16

318 intended to deliver support and resources to first responders through the implementation of a wellness application for
319 use by law enforcement officers and firefighters through fire companies statewide. The provisions of 29 Del. C. c. 69
320 shall not apply.
321 Section 21. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $858,400 in Permit to Purchase to Safety and Homeland Security,
322 State Police, State Bureau of Identification (45-06-08). The expenditure of these funds shall support full
323 implementation of Senate Substitute 1 for Senate Bill 2 as passed by the 152nd General Assembly.
324 Section 22. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $3,000,000 for Teacher-Driven Projects to the Department of
325 Education, District and Charter Operations, Other Items (95-02-02). The funding shall support classroom-based
326 literacy practices by enabling teachers to purchase evidence-based literacy materials for the classroom. Funding
327 priority shall be given to teachers in schools that have the lowest levels of literacy proficiency and/or that have been
328 designated for Targeted Support and Improvement (TSI) or Comprehensive Support and Improvement (CSI). The
329 Department of Education shall submit a report by April 1, 2026, to the Co-Chairs of the Joint Finance Committee, the
330 Controller General, and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget detailing the number of teachers who
331 received funding, the items purchased, and the projects supported with these funds, the administrative fees expended,
332 and any matching donations received from private entities.
333 Section 23. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $2,000,000 to the Department of Education, District and
334 Charter Operations, Other Items (95-02-02) for the Student Discipline Program. This funding shall be used to support
335 additional seats within the existing alternative school programs statewide. These funds shall be allocated in the
336 following manner: 50 percent to New Castle County, 25 percent to Kent County, and 25 percent to Sussex County. If
337 funds are used for personnel costs, they may only be used for the state share in accordance with the schedules
338 contained in 14 Del. C. c. 13. The services provided with this one-time funding shall provide year-round services as
339 deemed appropriate and determined by the consortium board and the Department of Education within the prescribed
340 state appropriation. The programs shall utilize research-based best-practice models and shall be considered a special
341 school for the purposes of charging tuition payments to be made by school districts of residence under the statutory
342 provisions of 14 Del. C. c. 6, such that the districts shall fund at least 30 percent of the total cost of the program. The
343 New Castle County Consortium and the Department of Education shall oversee the administration of the program and
344 may enter into contractual arrangements to operate the program. Such oversight shall include an annual evaluation of
345 the program to be submitted to the Department of Education. A report shall be submitted to the Joint Finance
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 13 of 16

346 Committee, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General by May 1, 2026, and
347 shall include the following: the number of students served; reasons for service; measures of behavioral improvement;
348 measures of academic improvement as appropriate; rates of recidivism within programs; and number and types of
349 referrals for additional services.
350 Section 24. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $1,000,000 to the Department of Education, District and
351 Charter Operations, Other Items (95-02-02) for School-Based Intervention Services Pilot Program. This funding shall
352 be used to provide on-site school-based intervention services for students whose behavior disrupts the classroom
353 setting and creates distractions that impede the learning process, but who are not eligible for placement in an
354 alternative program pursuant to 14 DE Admin. Code 611. School districts may offer such services based on the
355 identified needs of the district and its individual schools, subject to the requirements of 14 DE Admin. Code 609.
356 Services provided under this pilot program may be provided to any students in grades K to 12. The Department of
357 Education, in coordination with the Chief School Officers, shall oversee the administration of the program and identify
358 the school settings that would be most appropriate for this pilot. The Department of Education shall submit a report to
359 the Joint Finance Committee, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget and the Controller General by
360 May 1, 2026 and shall include the following: the number of students served; reasons for service; measures of
361 behavioral improvement; measures of academic improvement as appropriate; rates of recidivism within programs; and
362 number and types of referrals for additional services.
363 Section 25. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $1,700,000 to the Department of Education, Pass Through and
364 Other Support Programs, Special Needs Programs (95-03-20) to complete development of its early childhood data
365 system. Any funds remaining after data system expenses may be used by the Department of Education, Early
366 Childhood Support, for one-time initiatives to support Kent and Sussex County Head Start programming. These funds
367 shall not revert to the General Fund.
368 Section 26. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $500,000 for the Adult Trade Extension/Apprentice Program to
369 the Department of Education, Pass Through and Other Support Programs, Adult Education and Work Force Training
370 (95-03-50). This one-time funding shall be used to provide additional services and seats within the existing Adult
371 Trade Extension/Apprentice Programs statewide. This funding shall be distributed to the adult divisions of the three
372 county-wide vocational technical districts in the following amounts: N.C.C. Vo-Tech $250,000; Polytech $125,000;
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 14 of 16

373 and Sussex Tech $125,000. The allocations will be used to provide adult post-secondary technical/registered
374 apprentice training.
375 Section 27. (a) Amend § 3602, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through
376 and insertions as shown by underline as follows and redesignating accordingly:
377 § 3602. Definitions [For application of this section, see 84 Del. Laws, c. 373, § 3] [Expires upon fulfillment of
378 the contingency in 84 Del. Laws, c. 373, § 2].
379 As used in this chapter:
380 (1) “Council” means the Delaware Council on Farm and Food Policy, a convening of state and nonstate
381 food system stakeholders that advise the Delaware Secretary on Agriculture on food system topics.
382 (b) Amend § 3603, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions
383 as shown by underline as follows:
384 § 3603. Grants and financial support [For application of this section, see 84 Del. Laws, c. 373, § 3] [Expires
385 upon fulfillment of the contingency in 84 Del. Laws, c. 373, § 2].
386 (a) This bill chapter codifies the Program under the Delaware Grocery Initiative.
387 (b) The Division shall, subject to appropriation and in consultation with the Council, appropriation, establish
388 the Delaware Grocery Initiative to expand access to healthy foods in food deserts in Delaware and areas at risk of
389 becoming food deserts in Delaware by providing grants and other forms of financial assistance to an eligible food
390 resource, nonprofit food resource, local governmental unit food resource, or specialty grocer. The Division may:
391 (c) The Division shall coordinate with the Council to share information and findings from the Healthy Food
392 Retail Initiative to inform and make available technical assistance and counseling to Program participants. The Division
393 may rely on the Division’s regional business managers to provide 1-on-1 counseling to the Program participants and
394 assist Program participants to navigate regulatory processes, streamline compliance requirements, and access capital and
395 other funding opportunities.
396 (c) Amend § 3604, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions
397 as shown by underline as follows:
398 § 3604. Food access strategy [For application of this section, see 84 Del. Laws, c. 373, § 3] [Expires upon
399 fulfillment of the contingency in 84 Del. Laws, c. 373, § 2].
CG: RAM: JFC
0211530007 Page 15 of 16

400 (a) The Council shall, subject to appropriation, develop a food access strategy to address food insecurity
401 impacting populations within urban, suburban, and rural communities throughout the State. The strategy may include
402 the following:
403 (1) An analysis of identified vulnerabilities and concentrations of food insecurity risk, as well as a summary
404 of the causes of food insecurity.
405 (2) An inventory of food resources located throughout the State and a summary of specific barriers and
406 solutions identified by distribution and retail operators.
407 (3) An assessment of needs or gaps identified by food supply chain operators or individuals pursuing
408 ownership or operation of a food resource, with particular attention to those independent retail operations.
409 (4) A set of recommendations to address limited food access, the availability of nutritious food options,
410 and to facilitate the expansion of foods, including nutrient rich foods, into food deserts and areas at risk of becoming
411 food deserts.
412 (b) The Council shall consult with public and private food resources, as well as state and nonstate entities for
413 the purposes of creation, ongoing evaluation, implementation, and consideration of the food access strategy.
414 (c) The Council shall issue a report documenting the food access strategy and submit the report to members of
415 the General Assembly and the Office of the Governor by June 1, 2025. [Repealed.]